Tennessee, session 114, SB2236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-120-101(a)(12), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Shall allow a local government to amend adopted building codes after
consulting with a registered architect or engineer in the jurisdiction to include up to six
(6) family dwellings outside the scope of the adopted building codes for one- and two-
family dwellings by establishing minimum prescriptive requirements to address the
design and construction of dwellings that conform as follows:
(i) A separate means of egress is provided for each dwelling;
(ii) Dwellings are separated from each other by wall and floor assemblies
having not less than a two-hour fire resistance rating; and
(iii) The entire structure does not exceed three (3) stories above grade
plane;
(B) In amending the rules pursuant to this subdivision (a)(12), the state fire
marshal shall not mandate automatic fire sprinkler systems for up to six-family dwellings;
and
(C) Notwithstanding this subdivision (a)(12), local governments may adopt
mandatory sprinkler requirements and may permit the use of the National Fire Protection
Association (NFPA) 13D standard for up to six-family dwellings.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2236
012409
- 1 -